New Jersey, session 221, A4359.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   The Board of Public Utilities shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to supplement the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection f. of section 5 of P.L.2018, c.17 (C.48:3-87.11) to allow low- and moderate-income residential customers to self-attest to the customers income, in a form and manner to be determined by the board, as an acceptable income verification method for participation in a community solar program in this State established pursuant to P.L.2018, c.17 (C.48:3-87.8 et al.). 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment, except that the Board of Public Utilities may take anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.